Utah statutes.
57-14-201.   Owner owes no duty of care or duty to give warning -- Exceptions.

Except as provided in Subsections 57-14-204(1) and (2), an owner of land owes no duty of care to keep the land safe for entry or use by any person entering or using the land for any recreational purpose or to give warning of a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity on the land.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2013 General Session

